apertium-hun.hun.dix
<dictionary>

  <!-- {{{ alphabets and tags -->
  <alphabet>AÁBCDEÉFGHIÍJKLMNOÓÖŐPQRSTUÚÜŰVWXYZaábcdeéfghiíjklmnoóöőpqrstuúüűvwxyz</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="x"              c="UPOS=X"/>
    <sdef n="n"              c="UPOS=NOUN"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"          c="UPOS=AUX"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"           c="UPOS=AUX"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"          c="UPOS=VERB"/>
    <sdef n="np"             c="UPOS=PROPN"/>
    <sdef n="adj"            c="UPOS=ADJ"/>
    <sdef n="adv"            c="UPOS=ADV"/>
    <sdef n="post"           c="UPOS=ADP"/>
    <sdef n="det"            c="UPOS=DET"/>
    <sdef n="prn"            c="UPOS=PRON"/>
    <sdef n="ij"             c="UPOS=INTJ"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"         c="UPOS=CCONJ"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"         c="UPOS=SCONJ"/>
    <sdef n="num"            c="UPOS=NUM"/>

    <sdef n="acr"            c="Abbr=Yes"/>

    <sdef n="mf"            c="male-female"/>
    <sdef n="m"            c="male"/>
    <sdef n="f"            c="female"/>

    <sdef n="mod"            c="modal stuff"/>

    <sdef n="sg"             c="Number=Sing"/>
    <sdef n="pl"             c="Number=Plur"/>

    <sdef n="p1"             c="1. person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"             c="2. person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"             c="3. person"/>

    <sdef n="px1sg"          c="1. person singular possessive "/>
    <sdef n="px2sg"          c="2. person singular possessive "/>
    <sdef n="px3sg"          c="3. person singular possessive "/>
    <sdef n="px1pl"          c="1. person plural possessive"/>
    <sdef n="px2pl"          c="2. person plural possessive"/>
    <sdef n="px3pl"          c="3. person plural possessive"/>

    <sdef n="inf"            c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="pp"             c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"             c="Prest participle"/>
    <sdef n="pri"           c="Present tense"/>
    <sdef n="past"           c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="pot"            c="Potential form"/>
    <sdef n="cond"            c="Potential form"/>
    <sdef n="imp"            c="Imperatival form"/>
    <sdef n="subj"           c="Sub jontif"/>

    <sdef n="qst"            c="question"/>

    <sdef n="ant"            c="Anthroponym"/>

    <sdef n="itg"            c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="ind"            c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="pers"           c="Personal"/>
    <sdef n="def"            c="Definite"/>

    <sdef n="nom"            c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="acc"            c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="dat"            c="Dative"/>

    <sdef n="ine"            c="Inessive"/>
    <sdef n="ill"            c="Illative"/>
    <sdef n="all"            c="Allative"/>
    <sdef n="ses"            c="Superessive"/>
    <sdef n="ade"            c="Adessive"/>
    <sdef n="sub"           c="Sublative"/>
    <sdef n="ela"            c="Elative"/>
    <sdef n="dela"           c="Delative"/>
    <sdef n="abl"            c="Ablative"/>

    <sdef n="gen"            c="Genital"/>
    <sdef n="ins"            c="Instrumental"/>
    <sdef n="com"            c="Comitative"/>
    <sdef n="cau"            c="Causal"/>
    <sdef n="fin"            c="Final"/>
    <sdef n="tra"           c="Translative"/>
    <sdef n="term"           c="Terminative"/>
    <sdef n="ess1"         c="Essive-formal"/>
    <sdef n="ess2"         c="Essive-modal"/>

    <sdef n="comp"           c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"            c="Superlative"/>
    <sdef n="pos"            c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="card"            c="cardinal numeral"/>
    <sdef n="ord"            c="ordinal numeral"/>


    <sdef n="foo"            c="I dunno but I had to add some tag"/>
  </sdefs>

  <!-- }}}
       {{{ paradigms -->
  <pardefs>

    <!-- {{{ Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="és__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ha__cnjadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- }}}
         {{{ SECTION: Postpositions -->

    <pardef n="előtt__post">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- }}}
         {{{ SECTION: Determiners -->

    <pardef n="/a__det">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="det"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>az</l><r>a<s n="det"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>a</l><r>a<s n="det"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="egy__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- }}}
         {{{ SECTION: Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="/én__prn">
      <e><p><l>én</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>engem</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tőlem</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nálam</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hozzám</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nekem</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>velem</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>értem</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cau"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rólam</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>belőlem</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>belém</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bennem</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rajtam</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rám</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/te__prn">
      <e><p><l>te</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>téged</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tőled</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nálad</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hozzád</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>neked</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veled</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>érted</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cau"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rólad</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>belőled</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>beléd</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>benned</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rajtad</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rád</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="és"><i>és</i><par n="és__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="s"><i>s</i><par n="és__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="de"><i>de</i><par n="és__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ha"><i>ha</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="bár"><i>bár</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="meg"><i>meg</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="abba"><i>abba</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="afölött"><i>afölött</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ahelyett"><i>ahelyett</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="alá"><i>alá</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="alapján"><i>alapján</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="alátt"><i>alátt</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="által"><i>által</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="alul"><i>alul</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="amiatt"><i>amiatt</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="átellenben"><i>átellenben</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="átellen"><i>átellen</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="át"><i>át</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="azalatt"><i>azalatt</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="bele"><i>bele</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="belül"><i>belül</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="bévül"><i>bévül</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="efelett"><i>efelett</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="egybe"><i>egybe</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="együtt"><i>együtt</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ehelyett"><i>ehelyett</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="elismeréseképpen"><i>elismeréseképpen</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ellen"><i>ellen</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ellent"><i>ellent</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="elől"><i>elől</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="előtt"><i>előtt</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="emellett"><i>emellett</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="emitt"><i>emitt</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="eredményeképp"><i>eredményeképp</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ezalatt"><i>ezalatt</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="félbe"><i>félbe</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="felibe"><i>felibe</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="felül"><i>felül</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="fogvást"><i>fogvást</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="fölibe"><i>fölibe</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="fölött"><i>fölött</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="hanyatt"><i>hanyatt</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="hegyibe"><i>hegyibe</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="helyütt"><i>helyütt</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="imitt"><i>imitt</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="jóvá"><i>jóvá</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="keresztül"><i>keresztül</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="kívül"><i>kívül</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="körül"><i>körül</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="közbe"><i>közbe</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="közre"><i>közre</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="láttán"><i>láttán</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="másutt"><i>másutt</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="mialatt"><i>mialatt</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="mindamellett"><i>mindamellett</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="mindenekfölött"><i>mindenekfölött</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="mindezalatt"><i>mindezalatt</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="múlva"><i>múlva</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="neki"><i>neki</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="nyomán"><i>nyomán</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="révén"><i>révén</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="számra"><i>számra</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="szembe"><i>szembe</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="szerfelett"><i>szerfelett</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="szét"><i>szét</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="tova"><i>tova</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="újra"><i>újra</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="végbe"><i>végbe</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="végül"><i>végül</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i></i><par n="/a__det"/></e>
    <e lm="egy"><i>egy</i><par n="egy__det"/></e>
    <e lm="én"><i></i><par n="/én__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="te"><i></i><par n="/te__prn"/></e>
